Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3935.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.056, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council. (a) The Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council of 12 members is created in the legislative branch, consisting of: (1) two public members appointed by the senate Subcommittee on Committees of the Committee on Rules and Administration; (2) two public members appointed by the speaker of the house; (3) four public members appointed by the governor; (4) two members of the senate appointed by the senate Subcommittee on Committees of the Committee on Rules and Administration; and (5) two members of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house. (b) Members appointed under paragraph (a) must not be registered lobbyists. In making appointments, the governor, senate Subcommittee on Committees of the Committee on Rules and Administration, and the speaker of the house shall consider geographic balance, gender, age, ethnicity, and varying interests including hunting and fishing. The governor's appointments to the council are subject to the advice and consent of the senate. (c) Public members appointed under paragraph (a) shall have practical experience or expertise or demonstrated knowledge in the science, policy, or practice of restoring, protecting, and enhancing wetlands, prairies, forests, and habitat for fish, game, and wildlife. (d) Legislative members appointed under paragraph (a) shall include the chairs of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over environment and natural resources finance or their designee, one member from the minority party of the senate, and one member from the minority party of the house of representatives. (e) Public members serve four-year terms. Appointed legislative members serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority. Public and legislative members continue to serve until their successors are appointed. Public members shall be initially appointed according to the following schedule of terms: (1) two public members appointed by the governor for a term ending the first Monday in January 2011; (2) one public member appointed by the senate Subcommittee on Committees of the Committee on Rules and Administration for a term ending the first Monday in January 2011; (3) one public member appointed by the speaker of the house for a term ending the first Monday in January 2011; (4) two public members appointed by the governor for a term ending the first Monday in January 2013; (5) one public member appointed by the senate Subcommittee on Committees of the Committee on Rules and Administration for a term ending the first Monday in January 2013; and (6) one public member appointed by the speaker of the house for a term ending the first Monday in January 2013. (f) Terms, compensation, and removal of public members are as provided in section 15.0575, except that a public member may be compensated at the rate of up to $125 a day. A vacancy on the council may be filled by the appointing authority for the remainder of the unexpired term.new text begin A public member of the council may not serve more than eight years, except a public member may serve an additional six months as necessary to fill a vacancy.new text end (g) Members shall elect a chair, vice-chair, secretary, and other officers as determined by the council. The chair may convene meetings as necessary to conduct the duties prescribed by this section. (h) The Legislative Coordinating Commission may appoint nonpartisan staff and contract with consultants as necessary to support the functions of the council. The council has final approval authority for the hiring of a candidate for executive director. Up to one percent of the money appropriated from the fund may be used to pay for administrative expenses of the council and for compensation and expense reimbursement of council members. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026, and applies to appointments of public members made on or after that date, and years served on the council before July 1, 2026, count toward the limits imposed. new text end